pt-PT: Formato das unhas: Amêndoa; Ponta de flecha; Bailarina; Caixão; Edge; Sinalizador; Batom; Montanha; Oval; Cachimbo; Redondo; Quadrado; Stiletto; Outro
pl: Kształt paznokcia: Migdał; Grot; Balerina; Trumna; Krawędź; Flara; Szminka; Górski; Owalny; Rury; Runda; Kwadrat; Szpilki; Pozostałe
hr-HR: Oblik noktiju: Bademasti; Šiljasti; Balerina; Coffin; Rub; Trapez; U obliku ruža; Suženog vrha; Ovalni; Cijev; Okrugli; Kvadratni; Stiletto; Ostalo
fr: Forme des ongles: Amande; Pointe de flèche; Ballerine; Cercueil; Bord; Flamme; Rouge à lèvres; Montagne; Oval; Pipe; Rond; Carré; Stiletto; Autre
es: Forma de la uña: Almendra; Punta de flecha; Bailarina; Ataúd; Borde; Llamarada; Lápiz labial; Montaña; Ovalado; Tubo; Redondo; Cuadrado; Stiletto; Otros
sv: Nagelform: Mandel; Pilspets; Ballerina; Kista; Kant; Utsvängd; Läppstift; Fjäll; Oval; Rör; Rund; Fyrkantig; Stilett; Annat
cs: Tvar nehtu: Mandle; Hrot šípu; Baletka; Rakev; Hrana; Světlice; Rtěnka; Horský; Oválný; Potrubí; Oválná; Čtvercová; Dýka; Jiné
ko: 손톱 모양: 아몬드; 화살촉; 발레리나; 관; 엣지; 플레어; 립스틱; 산악; 타원형; 파이프; 라운드; 스퀘어; 단도; 기타
hu: Köröm formája: Mandula; Nyílhegy; Balerina; Koporsó; Hegyes; Fáklya; Rúzs; Hegy; Ovális; Cső; Kerek; Szögletes; Tőr; Egyéb
nl: Vorm nagel: Amandel; Pijlpunt; Ballerina; Kist; Rand; Lichtkogel; Lipstick; Berg; Ovaal; Pijp; Rond; Vierkant; Stiletto; Andere
it: Forma delle unghie: Mandorla; Punta di freccia; Ballerina; Cassa; A punta; Scampanata; Rossetto; Montagna; Ovale; Tubo; Rotondo; Quadrato; Stiletto; Altro
fi: Kynnen muoto: Manteli; Nuolenkärki; Ballerina; Arkku; Reuna; Leimahdus; Huulipuna; Vuoristoinen; Soikea; Putki; Pyöreä; Neliömäinen; Tikari; Muu
zh-TW: 指甲形狀: 杏仁; 箭頭; 芭蕾舞女演員; 棺材; 邊緣; 耀斑; 口紅; 山; 橢圓形; 管狀; 圓頭; 方頭; 短劍; 其他
vi: Kiểu dáng móng tay: Mũi giày quả hạnh; Đầu mũi tên; Ballerina; Hình quan tài; Cạnh; Loe ra; Son; Núi; Hình trái xoan; Ống; Mũi giày tròn; Mũi giày vuông; Gót nhọn cao; Khác
th: รูปร่างของเล็บ: อัลมอนด์; หัวลูกศร; Ballerina; ทรงคอฟฟิน; ขอบ; แฟลร์; ลิปสติก; ภูเขา; รูปไข่; ท่อ; ทรงกลม; ทรงเหลี่ยม; กริช; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Oblika nohtov: Mandelj; Puščica; Balerina; Krsta; Podaljšana puščica; Zvonček; Šminka; Kratki stiletto; Ovalno; Ravni mandelj; Okrogla; Kvadratna; Stiletto; Drugo
ru: Форма ногтя: Миндаль; Острая; Балерина; Гробик; Угловая; Широкая; Скошенная; Пика; Овал; Труба; Круг; Квадрат; Стилет; Другая
pt-BR: Formato da unha: Ponta arredondada; Ponta de flecha; Bailarina; Caixão; Margem; Chama; Batom; Montanha; Oval; Tubo; Redondo; Quadrado; Estilete; Outro
el: Σχήμα νυχιών: Αμυγδαλέλαιο; Αιχμή βέλους; Μπαλαρίνα; Κάσα; Μύτη; Καμπάνα; Κραγιόν; Βουνού; Οβάλ; Σωλήνας; Στρογγυλό; Τετράγωνο; Στιλέτο; Άλλο
sk-SK: Tvar nechtov: Mandľa; Hrot šípu; Balerína; Rakva; Hrana; Vzplanutie; Rúž; Hora; Oválny; Rúrka; Okrúhly; Hranatý; Stiletto; Iné
nb: Negleform: Mandel; Pilspiss; Ballerina; Kiste; Kant; Utflaringer; Leppestift; Fjell; Oval; Rør; Rund; Firkantet; Stiletto; Annen
ja: 爪の形: アーモンド; 矢じり; バレリーナ; 棺; エッジ; フレア; リップスティック; マウンテン; 楕円形; パイプ; ラウンド; スクエア; スティレット; その他
ro-RO: Forma unghiei: Migdalată; Săgeată; Balerină; Coffin; Edge; Flare; Lipstick; Mountain; Ovală; Pipe; Rotundă; Pătrată; Stiletto; Altele
en: Nail shape: Almond; Arrowhead; Ballerina; Coffin; Edge; Flare; Lipstick; Mountain; Oval; Pipe; Round; Square; Stiletto; Other
zh-CN: 指甲形状: 杏仁; 箭头; 芭蕾软鞋; 棺材; 边缘; 耀斑; 口红; 山地; 椭圆形; 烟斗; 圆头; 方形; 细高跟女鞋; 其他
tr: Tırnak şekli: Badem burun; Ok ucu; Balerin; Tabut; Kenar; Parlama; Ruj; Dağ; Oval; Boru; Yuvarlak; Kare; Stiletto; Diğer
lt-LT: Nagų forma: Migdolas; Smailėjantys; Balerina; „Coffin“; Trikampio; Platėjantys; Kampuoti; „Mountain“; Ovalūs; „Pipe“; Apvalūs; Kvadratiniai; „Stiletto“; Kita
de: Nagelform: Mandel; Pfeilspitze; Ballerina; Sarg; Kante; Fackel; Lippenstift; Berg; Oval; Rohr; Rund; Quadrat; Stilett; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Форма на ноктите: Бадем; Връх на стрела; Балерина; Ковчег; Ръб; Блясък; Червило; Планина; Овален; Тръба; Кръгъл; Квадратен; Стилет; Други
da: Negleform: Mandel; Pilespids; Ballerina; Kiste; Kant; Flare; Læbestift; Bjerg; Oval; Rør; Rund; Firkant; Stiletto; Andet